el: Κύρια περιοχή: Αφρική; Ασία-Ειρηνικός; Ευρώπη; Λατινική Αμερική; Μέση Ανατολή; Βόρεια Αμερική; Ωκεανία; Άλλο
hr-HR: Primarna regija: Afrika; Azija-Pacifik; Europa; Latinska Amerika; Bliski istok; Sjeverna Amerika; Oceanija; Ostalo
fi: Ensisijainen alue: Afrikka; Aasian ja Tyynenmeren alue; Eurooppa; Latinalainen Amerikka; Lähi-itä; Pohjois-Amerikka; Oseania; Muu
ja: 主な地域: アフリカ; アジア太平洋; ヨーロッパ; ラテンアメリカ; 中東; 北米; オセアニア; その他
en: Primary region: Africa; Asia-Pacific; Europe; Latin America; Middle East; North America; Oceania; Other
es: Región primaria: África; Asia-Pacífico; Europa; América Latina; Oriente Medio; América del norte; Oceanía; Otros
ro-RO: Regiunea principală: Africa; Asia-Pacific; Europa; America Latină (LA); Orientul Mijlociu; Africa de Sud; Oceania; Altele
nb: Primærregion: Afrika; Asia-Stillehavet; Europa; Latinamerika; Midtøsten; Nord-Amerika; Oseania; Annet
zh-TW: 主要地區: 非洲; 亞太地區; 歐洲; 拉丁美洲; 中東; 北美洲; 大洋洲; 其他
ru: Первичный регион: Африка; Азиатско-Тихоокеанский регион; Европа; Латинская Америка; Ближний Восток; Северная Америка; Океания; Другой
bg-BG: Основен регион: Африка; Азиатско-тихоокеански регион; Европа; Латинска Америка; Близкия изток; Северна Америка; Океания; Други
sk-SK: Primárny región: Afrika; Ázia a Tichomorie; Európa; Latinská Amerika; Stredný východ; Severná Amerika; Oceánia; Iné
de: Primäre Region: Afrika; Asien-Pazifik; Europa; Lateinamerika; Naher Osten; Nordamerika; Ozeanien; Sonstiges
th: ภูมิภาคหลัก: แอฟริกา; เอเชีย-แปซิฟิก; ยุโรป; ละตินอเมริกา; ตะวันออกกลาง; อเมริกาเหนือ; โอเชียเนีย; อื่นๆ
sv: Primär region: Afrika; Asien-Stillahavsområdet; Europa; Latinamerika; Mellanöstern; Nordamerika; Oceanien; Övrigt
it: Area geografica primaria: Africa; Asia-Pacifico; Europa; America Latina; Medio Oriente; Nord America; Oceania; Altro
pt-BR: Região primária: África; Ásia-Pacífico; Europa; América Latina; Oriente Médio; América do Norte; Oceania; Outro
da: Primær region: Afrika; Asien-Stillehavsområdet; Europa; Latinamerika; Mellemøsten; Nordamerika; Oceanien; Andet
zh-CN: 主要区域: 非洲; 亚太地区; 欧洲; 拉丁美洲; 中东; 北美; 大洋洲; 其他
sl-SI: Primarna regija: Afrika; Azija-Pacifik; Evropa; Latinska Amerika; Bližnji vzhod; Severna Amerika; Oceanija; Drugo
fr: Région principale: Afrique; Asie-Pacifique; Europe; Amérique latine; Moyen-Orient; Amérique du Nord; Océanie; Autre
lt-LT: Pagrindinis regionas: Afrika; Azijos ir Ramiojo vandenyno regionas; Europa; Lotynų Amerika; Artimieji Rytai; Šiaurės Amerika; Okeanija; Kita
ko: 기본 지역: 아프리카; 아시아-태평양; 유럽; 라틴 아메리카; 중동; 북아메리카; 오세아니아; 기타
cs: Primární oblast: Afrika; Asie a Tichomoří; Evropa; Latinská Amerika; Střední východ; Severní Amerika; Oceánie; Jiné
pt-PT: Região principal: África; Ásia-Pacífico; Europa; América Latina; Médio Oriente; América do Norte; Oceânia; Outro
pl: Region podstawowy: Afryka; Azja i Pacyfik; Europa; Ameryka Łacińska; Bliski Wschód; Ameryka Północna; Oceania; Inne
nl: Primaire regio: Afrika; Azië-Pacific; Europa; Latijns-Amerika; Midden-Oosten; Noord-Amerika; Oceanië; Andere
hu: Elsődleges régió: Afrika; Ázsiai és csendes-óceáni térség; Európa; Latin-Amerika; Közel-Kelet; Észak-Amerika; Óceánia; Egyéb
vi: Vùng sơ cấp: Châu Phi; Châu á Thái Bình Dương; Châu Âu; Mỹ La-tinh; Trung Đông; Bắc Mỹ; Châu Đại Dương; Khác
tr: Birincil bölge: Afrika; Asya Pasifik; Avrupa; Latin Amerika; Orta Doğu; Kuzey Amerika; Okyanusya; Diğer